Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.090

Rule-making authority.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington professional educator standards board may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the effective and efficient implementation of this chapter.

[ 2022 c 107 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.